Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.345.130

Model policy and procedure for instructional materials—Diverse and inclusive curricula.

(1) By June 1, 2025, the Washington state school directors' association, with the assistance of the office of the superintendent of public instruction, must review and update a model policy and procedure regarding course design, selection, and adoption of instructional materials.

(2) The model policy and procedure must require that school district boards of directors, within available materials, adopt inclusive curricula and select diverse, equitable, inclusive, age-appropriate instructional materials that include the histories, contributions, and perspectives of historically marginalized and underrepresented groups including, but not limited to, people from various racial, ethnic, and religious backgrounds, people with differing learning needs, people with disabilities, LGBTQ people as the term is defined in RCW 43.114.010, and people with various socioeconomic and immigration backgrounds.

(3) The model policy and procedure must require that, in adopting curricula and selecting instructional materials in accordance with this section, school district boards of directors must seek curricula and instructional materials that are as culturally and experientially diverse as possible, recognizing that the availability of materials that include the histories, contributions, and perspectives of historically marginalized and underrepresented groups may vary.

(4) By October 1, 2025, school district boards of directors must amend the policy and procedures required under RCW 28A.320.230 to conform with the model policy and procedure required by this section. Additionally, by October 1, 2025, charter school boards and schools subject to state-tribal education compacts must adopt or amend their policies and procedures governing curricula adoption and the selection of instructional materials to conform with the model policy and procedure required by this section. For the purpose of documenting compliance with this section and assisting school districts in accordance with RCW 28A.300.1251, school district boards of directors, within 10 days of completing the policy and procedure updates required by this subsection (4), shall provide notice of the completed actions and electronic copies of the applicable policies and procedures to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(5) This section governs school operation and management under RCW 28A.710.040 and 28A.715.020, and applies to charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW and state-tribal education compact schools subject to chapter 28A.715 RCW to the same extent as it applies to school districts.

[ 2024 c 157 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—2024 c 157: "(1) The legislature recognizes that Washington state law prohibits discrimination in public schools for certain protected classes. The legislature also acknowledges that school districts are required to adopt a policy related to the selection or removal of instructional materials. Under state rule, the instructional materials policy of each school district must establish and use appropriate screening criteria to identify and eliminate bias pertaining to protected classes.

(2) The legislature intends to expand these requirements by requiring school districts to adopt policies and procedures that incorporate adopting inclusive curricula and selecting inclusive instructional materials that include the histories, contributions, and perspectives of historically marginalized and underrepresented groups. The legislature recognizes that inclusive curricula have been shown to often improve the mental health, academic performance, attendance rates, and graduation rates of historically marginalized and underrepresented communities. Research on students' sense of belonging and community in the school setting confirms that inclusive curricula and learning environments contribute to increased school motivation, participation, and achievement.

(3) The legislature intends to promote culturally and experientially representative learning opportunities for all students by directing the office of the superintendent of public instruction, when revising or developing state learning standards, to screen for inappropriate bias in the proposed state learning standards and to ensure that the histories, contributions, and perspectives of historically marginalized and underrepresented peoples and communities are included in the standards.

(4) The legislature believes that promoting inclusive learning standards, curricula, and instructional materials will improve student achievement, attendance, parent and family engagement, and other dimensions that contribute to student success." [ 2024 c 157 s 1.]